Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Bureau of Vital Statistics and Registrar.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, § 108.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 74, 75.

Sec. 18.50.010.
Bureau of Vital Statistics.

There is established within the department a section to be called the Bureau of Vital Statistics which shall install, maintain, and operate the state system of vital statistics.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.020.
Department to adopt regulations.

The department may, in compliance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), adopt, amend, and repeal regulations for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

History.

(§ 3 ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

Sec. 18.50.030.
Appointment of state registrar of vital statistics.

The commissioner shall select the state registrar of vital statistics in accordance with state personnel laws and regulations.
The registrar shall carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 4 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.040.
Duties of state registrar.

The state registrar shall

administer and enforce this chapter and the regulations adopted under it, and issue instructions for the efficient administration of the statewide system of vital statistics;

direct and supervise the statewide system of vital statistics and the bureau, and keep its records;

direct, supervise, and control the activities of local registrars related to the operation of the vital statistics system;

prescribe and furnish the forms required by this chapter and the regulations issued under it;

prepare and publish reports of vital statistics and other required statistical reports.

History.

(§ 5 a ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

For special procedures, see 7 AAC 5, art. 3.

For ambulatory surgical facilities, see 7 AAC 12, art. 8.

Sec. 18.50.050.
Delegation of duties.

The state registrar may delegate the functions and duties vested in the state registrar to employees of the bureau and to local registrars as the state registrar considers necessary or expedient.

History.

(§ 5 b ch 118 SLA 1960)

Sec. 18.50.060.
Seal.

The state registrar shall have a seal, which shall bear within the perimeter of the seal the words “Seal of the State Registrar of Vital Statistics of Alaska,” and within the circle, at the top of the seal, a star representing the north star, beneath it the Dipper of seven stars, and beneath this a quill.
The seal shall be used in the certification of copies of records under custody of the state registrar, and to authenticate other copies, documents, records, and reports the state registrar considers necessary.

History.

(§ 5 c ch 118 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.

Sec. 18.50.070.
Registration districts.

The state registrar shall establish registration districts throughout the state. The state registrar may consolidate or subdivide a district to facilitate registration. Registration districts shall take into account the boundary lines of local governmental units, house districts, judicial districts, and other local boundary lines in general use, where feasible.

History.

(§ 6 ch 118 SLA 1960; am § 73 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 7 AAC 5, art. 1.